src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UNG_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲ʼusägúng - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UNG_STEM_1

     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Sg+Impv: k̲ʼusägúng
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngga
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúng
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúnggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Dir+Past: k̲ʼusägúnggan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Rel: k̲ʼusägúngs
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngganggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúnggangang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggiinii
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggaangaan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ʼusägúngäsaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ʼusägúngäs
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Simp+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngäsaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Imm+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngäsga
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Rel+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngäsaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Fut+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngäsaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaʼáa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaʼáang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼuuj
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Res: k̲ʼusägúngäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼujaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼuujaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngäsaaʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Cert+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ʼusägúngäseehl
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Pl+Impv: k̲ʼusägúngʼuu
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼwägan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼaawaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼaawaan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Rel: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲ʼusägúngʼaawaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼaawaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼwaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼwaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼwaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼwägiinii
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼwägaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼwägaangaan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäs
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsga
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Res: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Cont: k̲ʼusägúngʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Rflx: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaʼahl
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaaäseehl
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: k̲ʼusägúngʼang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangga
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Dir+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼanggan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Indir+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangaan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Rel: k̲ʼusägúngʼans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼangang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼangang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼanggiinii
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼanggaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼanggaangaan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäs
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsga
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaaʼáng
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaaʼánggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼuuj
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Res: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼujaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼuujaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsaaʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangʼahlanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Cert+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangʼahlanggan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangʼahlans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Ints+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangaaʼahlang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Cont: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Rflx: k̲ʼusägúngʼaangʼahl
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ʼusägúngʼangäseehl
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼuu
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwägan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼaawaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼaawaan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼaawaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼaawaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼangʼwaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼangʼwaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúnggangʼangʼwaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwägiinii
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwägaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwägaangaan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäs
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsaang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsga
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsaas
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Res: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaʼahl
     k̲ʼusägúng+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲ʼusägúngʼangʼwaaäseehl
